Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2729YH (7) 91 jda/jh H.F. 804 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 280.36 relating to state criminal 4 history checks for persons who are engaged to perform 5 construction work in the same manner as a school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 280.36 relating to state criminal 10 history checks for persons who are engaged to perform 11 construction work in the same manner as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Contractors ââ background 13 investigations. 14 1. Prior to engaging any person to perform construction 15 work, the board of directors of each school district and the 16 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 17 have access to and shall review the sex offender registry 18 information under section 692A.121 available to the general 19 public, the central registry for child abuse information 20 established under section 235A.14, and the central registry 21 for dependent adult abuse information established under 22 section 235B.5, for information regarding all of the following 23 individuals: 24 a. The person engaged to perform the construction work. 25 b. Employees of the person who will perform any part of the 26 construction work. 27 c. Employees of any contractor or subcontractor engaged by 28 the person to perform any part of the construction work. 29 2. The board of directors of each school district and the 30 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 31 maintain documentation demonstrating compliance with subsection 32 1. 33 3. The board of directors of a school district or the 34 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school may 35 -1- LSB 2729YH (7) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 804 charge the person who is engaged to perform the construction 1 work for the cost of the registry checks conducted pursuant to 2 subsection 1. 3 4. The board of directors of each school district and the 4 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school 5 shall not allow any individual described in subsection 1, 6 paragraph âaâ , âbâ , or âcâ , who is listed in the sex offender 7 registry established under chapter 692A, the central registry 8 for child abuse information established under section 235A.14, 9 or the central registry for dependent adult abuse information 10 established under section 235B.5, to perform any part of the 11 construction work. 12 5. For purposes of this section, âconstruction workâ means 13 all of the following: 14 a. The construction of a new attendance center. 15 b. The renovation or remodeling of an attendance center 16 during the school calendar and where students are in 17 attendance. 18